Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.060

Project selection—Performance criteria.

(1) The planning committee shall consider the following criteria for selecting transportation projects to improve corridor performance:

(a) Reduced level of congestion and improved safety;

(b) Improved travel time;

(c) Improved air quality;

(d) Increases in daily and peak period person and vehicle trip capacity;

(e) Reductions in person and vehicle delay;

(f) Improved freight mobility; and

(g) Cost-effectiveness of the investment.

(2) These criteria represent only minimum standards that must be considered in selecting transportation improvement projects. The board shall also consider rules and standards for benchmarks adopted by the transportation commission or its successor.

[ 2002 c 56 s 106.]